Wyoming, session 2025, HB0005.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 23-3-206 is created to read:
23-3-206. Commercially guided fishing boats;
regulatory authority; advisory board; definitions.
(a) To protect the quality of the fishing experience,
the fishery and other aquatic resources and species in this
state, the commission may set limits on or otherwise
regulate the number of commercially guided fishing boats
allowed to launch into or use any river or lake or section
thereof in this state. This subsection shall not apply to a
person who uses a city, town, county or state boat ramp or
other access point to launch a commercially guided fishing
boat to guide fishermen if the person is guiding the
fishermen to a location where the lands are owned or leased
by the person or the person's immediate family member.
(b) There is created a commercially guided fishing
boats advisory board. The board shall consist of seven (7)
members appointed by the commission. One (1) member shall
be appointed from each appointment district pursuant to
W.S. 9-1-218 and at least two (2) members appointed shall
be Wyoming owned drift boat guide business owners. Members
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0005
ENROLLED ACT NO. 31, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
shall serve a four (4) year term. The commission may remove
any member of the board, subject to W.S. 9-1-202. Vacancies
of the board shall be filled by appointment for the
unexpired term. The board shall provide recommendations to
the commission for promulgating rules under subsection (c)
of this section. Members of the board shall receive no
compensation but shall be reimbursed by the commission for
per diem and travel expenses incurred in the performance of
their official duties in the same manner and amount as
state employees.
(c) The commission may promulgate rules governing the
registration and means of tracking the number of
commercially guided fishing boats launching into or using
any river or lake or section thereof. The commission may
hold public meetings in each county in which its rules
apply. The rules shall require registration and payment of
an annual fee for each commercially guided fishing boat
beginning January 1, 2026. The department shall provide two
(2) registration stickers one (1) of which shall be
displayed on each commercially guided fishing boat and
trailer registered under this subsection.
(d) As used in this section:
(i) "Commercially guided fishing boat" means a
fishing boat that is operated by an outfitter or
professional fishing guide to provide fishing guide
services for financial gain;
(ii) "Fishing guide services" means for hire or
remuneration, accompanying and providing assistance to a
person on a river or lake or section thereof for the
purposes of fishing;
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0005
ENROLLED ACT NO. 31, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iii) "Operate" means to navigate or otherwise
use a commercially guided fishing boat;
(iv) "Outfitter" or "professional fishing guide"
means a person who advertises or holds himself out to the
public for hire for the purpose of financial gain to
provide fishing guide services, excluding any person who
furnishes fishing equipment or boats to a person for
exclusively personal and temporary use. "Outfitter" or
"professional fishing guide" includes any person requiring
the payment of fees or remuneration for providing personal
services on a river or lake or section thereof for the
purposes of fishing.
Section 2. Not later than November 1, 2025, the game
and fish commission and the commercially guided fishing
boats advisory board created in section 1 of this act shall
make recommendations to the joint travel, recreation,
wildlife and cultural resources interim committee on the
creation of a new board or amendment to an existing board
to carry out the duties specified in section 1 of this act.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0005
ENROLLED ACT NO. 31, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4